Hawaii, session 2025, HB1204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 329-123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  Primary caregivers shall register with the department of health.  [Every] A primary caregiver [shall] may be responsible for the care of [only] more than one qualifying patient at any given time[, unless the primary caregiver is the parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of more than one minor qualifying patient, in which case the primary caregiver may be responsible for the care of more than one minor qualifying patient at any given time; provided that the primary caregiver is the parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of all of the primary caregiver's qualifying patients]. The department of health may permit registration of up to two primary caregivers for a minor qualifying patient; provided that both primary caregivers are the parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of the minor qualifying patient." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that on June 30, 2030, this Act shall be repealed and section 329-123(c), Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which it read on the day prior to the effective date of this Act. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________